Louisiana, session 2026, HB522.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1563.1 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1563.1. Authority to make arrests and carry firearms; arson task force
A. The fire marshal, the first assistant fire marshal, each deputy fire marshal,
certified local authorities, and state or municipal arson investigators, while engaged
in the performance of their duties as such, shall have the authority to investigate and
cause the arrest of individuals suspected of having violated the following criminal
laws:
(1) R.S. 14:51, aggravated arson.
(2) R.S. 14:52, simple arson.
(3) R.S. 14:52.1, simple arson of a religious building.
(4) R.S. 14:53, arson with intent to defraud.
Page 1 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-792 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 522
(5) R.S. 14:54, placing combustible material.
(6) R.S. 14:54.1, communicating false information of planned arson.
(7) R.S. 14:54.2, manufacture and possession of delayed action incendiary
devices.
(8) R.S. 14:54.3, manufacture and possession of a bomb.
(9) R.S. 14:54.5, fake explosive devices.
(10) R.S. 14:59(A)(2), criminal mischief relating to the giving of any false
alarm of fire.
(11) R.S. 14:204, fire-raising on lands of another by criminal negligence.
(12) R.S. 14:205, fire-raising on lands of another with malice.
(13) R.S. 14:206, fire prevention interference.
(14) R.S. 14:327, obstructing a fireman.
(15) R.S. 22:1924, insurance fraud.
(16) R.S. 22:1925, insurance fraud.
(17) R.S. 14.51.1, injury by arson.
(18) R.S. 15:562.5, failure to register.
(19) R.S. 40:1621, violation of fire marshal's orders. This Paragraph shall
be limited to fire marshal orders related to activities or instances determined by the
fire marshal to pose an immediate danger to life.
(20) R.S. 14:206.1, engaging in life safety and property protection
contracting without authority.
(21) Any other criminal laws making unlawful an attempt or conspiracy to
commit the foregoing offenses.
B. The officials enumerated in this Section shall also have the power to seize
contraband subject to forfeiture as described in R.S. 14:54.4, in accordance with the
procedure established in that provision.
C. The fire marshal, the first assistant fire marshal, and each deputy fire
marshal shall have the authority to investigate and cause the arrest of any person
suspected of having committed any offense connected to the investigation of any of
Page 2 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-792 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 522
the offenses enumerated in Subsection A of this Section, or connected to the
investigation of a burn injury report submitted to the office of state fire marshal in
accordance with R.S. 14:403.4.
D. The fire marshal shall issue a commission to any state arson investigator
who qualifies as P.O.S.T. certified to carry firearms allowing him to carry and use
firearms and to arrest individuals suspected of violating the crimes enumerated in
this Section.
E. The governing authority of a political subdivision may authorize the chief
of each fire protection district, each fire department, and each volunteer fire
department which is within that political subdivision to issue a commission to any
local arson investigator allowing him to carry and use firearms and to arrest
individuals suspected of violating crimes enumerated in this Section. The issuance
of a commission pursuant to this Subsection, the powers granted by those
commissions, and the use of firearms by the persons to whom those commissions are
issued shall be subject to all of the following provisions:
(1) The chief of each fire protection district, each fire department, and each
volunteer fire department who issues a commission to a local arson investigator may
require that the local arson investigator be certified by the Council on Peace Officer
Standards and Training or be qualified by the Council on Peace Officer Standards
and Training, or both.
(2) The chief of each fire protection district, each fire department, and each
volunteer fire department who requires that local arson investigators to whom that
chief issues commissions be P.O.S.T. certified or P.O.S.T. qualified, or both, shall
pay the cost of providing to those local arson investigators the training necessary to
obtain the P.O.S.T. certification or the P.O.S.T. qualification, or both.
(3) Local arson investigators who are required by their chief to be P.O.S.T.
certified or P.O.S.T. qualified, or both, are specifically authorized to attend any
school or training course which is operated by a commercial entity or which is
operated by a public agency and which is open to peace officers from more than one
Page 3 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-792 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 522
law enforcement agency. Each person or agency operating a school or a training
course which is attended by local arson investigators shall award the appropriate
document or documents to each local arson investigator who successfully completes
the requirements for P.O.S.T. certification or for P.O.S.T. qualification, or both. The
Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice
and the Council on Peace Officer Standards and Training shall make the provisions
which are necessary to enable local arson investigators to attend the required schools
and training courses and for those local arson investigators who successfully
complete the requirements for P.O.S.T. certification or P.O.S.T. qualification, or for
both, to receive the appropriate documents to demonstrate the P.O.S.T. certification
or P.O.S.T. qualification, or both.
(4) Possession of a P.O.S.T. certification or P.O.S.T. qualification, or both,
by a local arson investigator shall not grant to that local arson investigator any
authority other than the authority granted by a commission issued pursuant to this
Subsection.
(5) The authority granted by a commission which is issued under the
provisions of this Subsection shall be limited to the powers, functions, duties, and
responsibilities which are set forth for local arson investigators in this Section. A
commission which is issued under the provisions of this Subsection shall not grant
any authority other than the powers, functions, duties, and responsibilities which are
set forth for local arson investigators in this Section.
(6) The authority to carry and use firearms which is granted to local arson
investigators by a commission which is issued under the provisions of this
Subsection is limited to the power to carry weapons while acting in the course and
scope of their duties as local arson investigators. Local arson investigators may
carry concealed weapons while acting in the course and scope of their duties, and the
provisions of R.S. 14:95 shall not apply to local arson investigators who carry
concealed weapons while acting in the course and scope of their duties.
Page 4 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-792 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 522
F. The fire marshal shall have the authority to commission local certified
arson investigators to serve on a multi-jurisdictional arson task force operated by the
fire marshal. The fire marshal shall have the power to promulgate rules and
regulations to accomplish the operations and functions of the task force and to issue
orders for the enforcement of such rules and regulations.
A.(1) The state fire marshal, the first assistant fire marshal, and each deputy
fire marshal shall have the authority to do all of the following while engaged in the
performance of their duties:
(a) Investigate and cause the arrest of individuals.
(b) Enforce the laws of the state.
(c) Perform any other related duties imposed upon them by law.
(2) The state fire marshal, the first assistant fire marshal, and each deputy
fire marshal may carry weapons concealed or exposed while in the performance of
their duties and shall be vested with the same authority and powers conferred by law
upon regular law enforcement officers of the state.
(3) The state fire marshal, the first assistant fire marshal, and each deputy
fire marshal shall have all immunities and defenses in any suit brought against them
as a consequence of acts performed in the course and scope of their employment.
B. The state fire marshal shall issue a commission that authorizes the
carrying of firearms to any state arson investigator who is certified in the use of
firearms by the Peace Officer Standards and Training Council. Any state arson
investigator who is issued a commission pursuant to this Subsection is authorized to
carry and use firearms and to arrest individuals suspected of committing a criminal
offense.
C.(1) The governing authority of a political subdivision may authorize the
chief of each fire protection district and each fire department to issue a commission
to any local arson investigator that allows the investigator to carry and use firearms
and to arrest individuals suspected of committing a criminal offense.
Page 5 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-792 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 522
(2) A local arson investigator who receives a commission pursuant to this
Subsection shall obtain P.O.S.T. firearm credentials. The chief of the fire protection
district or the fire department shall pay the cost of providing the necessary training
to a local arson investigator in order to obtain P.O.S.T. firearm credentials.
(3) A local arson investigator who is required to obtain P.O.S.T. firearm
credentials may attend any school or training course that is operated by a commercial
entity or a public agency and is open to peace officers from more than one law
enforcement agency. Each person or agency operating a school or a training course
that is attended by a local arson investigator shall award the appropriate
documentation to each local arson investigator who successfully completes the
requirements for obtaining P.O.S.T. firearm credentials. The Louisiana Commission
on Law Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice and the Council on
Peace Officer Standards and Training shall take any necessary action to enable a
local arson investigator to attend the required schools and training courses and to
ensure a local arson investigator receives the appropriate documents to demonstrate
that he has successfully obtained P.O.S.T. firearm credentials upon completion of the
required schooling and training.
(4) Possession of P.O.S.T. firearm credentials does not grant a local arson
investigator any authority beyond the scope of the commission issued pursuant to
this Subsection.
(5) The authority granted by a commission that is issued pursuant to this
Subsection shall be limited to only the powers, functions, duties, and responsibilities
that are established for a local arson investigator in this Section.
(6) The authority of a local arson investigator to carry and use firearms
pursuant to this Subsection is limited to the carrying of weapons while acting in the
course and scope of his official duties. A local arson investigator who carries a
concealed weapon pursuant to this Paragraph shall not be subject to criminal
prosecution for a violation of R.S. 14:95.
Page 6 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-792 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 522
(7) For purposes of this Subsection, "P.O.S.T. firearm credentials" means a
certification, qualification, or both, in the use of firearms by the Council on Peace
Officer Standards and Training.
D. The provisions of this Section shall be null and void on June 30, 2028.
Section 2. R.S. 40:1563.1.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1563.1.1. Authority to make arrests and carry firearms
A. The state fire marshal, the first assistant fire marshal, and each deputy fire
marshal, while engaged in the performance of their official duties, are authorized to
investigate and cause the arrest of individuals suspected of having committed any of
the following:
(1) R.S. 14:51 (Aggravated arson).
(2) R.S. 14.51.1 (Injury by arson).
(3) R.S. 14:52 (Simple arson).
(4) R.S. 14:52.1 (Simple arson of a religious building).
(5) R.S. 14:53 (Arson with intent to defraud).
(6) R.S. 14:54.1 (Communicating of false information of planned arson).
(7) R.S. 14:54.2 (Manufacture and possession of delayed action incendiary
devices).
(8) R.S. 14:54.3 (Manufacture and possession of a bomb).
(9) R.S. 14:54.5 (Fake explosive device).
(10) R.S. 14:59(A)(2) (Criminal mischief relative to the giving of any false
alarm of fire).
(11) R.S. 14:204 (Fire-raising on lands of another by criminal negligence).
(12) R.S. 14:205 (Fire-raising on lands of another with malice).
(13) R.S. 14:206 (Fire prevention interference).
(14) R.S. 14:206.1 (Engaging in life safety and property protection
contracting without authority).
(15) R.S. 14:327 (Obstructing a fireman).
(16) R.S. 15:562.5 (Failure to register).
Page 7 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-792 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 522
(17) R.S. 22:1924 (Insurance fraud; prohibited activities and sanctions).
(18) R.S. 22:1925 (Insurance fraud; automobile insurance policies).
(19) R.S. 40:1621 (Violation of fire marshal's orders limited to fire marshal
orders related to activities or instances determined by the fire marshal to pose an
immediate danger to life).
(20) Any other criminal laws that prohibit an attempt or conspiracy to
commit the offenses provided in this Subsection.
B. The officials enumerated in this Section are authorized to seize
contraband that is subject to forfeiture as provided in R.S. 14:54.4.
C. The state fire marshal, the first assistant fire marshal, and each deputy fire
marshal are authorized to investigate and cause the arrest of any of the following:
(1) A person suspected of committing any offense connected to the
investigation of any offense provided in Subsection A of this Section.
(2) A person connected to the investigation of a burn injury report that is
submitted to the office of state fire marshal in accordance with R.S. 14:403.4.
D. The state fire marshal shall issue a commission that authorizes the
carrying of firearms to any state arson investigator who is certified in the use of
firearms by the Peace Officer Standards and Training Council. Any state arson
investigator who is issued a commission pursuant to this Subsection is authorized to
carry and use firearms and to arrest individuals suspected of committing the offenses
provided in Subsection A of this Section.
E.(1) The governing authority of a political subdivision may authorize the
chief of each fire protection district and each fire department to issue a commission
to any local arson investigator that allows the investigator to carry and use firearms
and to arrest individuals suspected of committing the offenses provided in
Subsection A of this Section.
(2) A local arson investigator who receives a commission pursuant to this
Subsection shall obtain P.O.S.T. firearm credentials. The chief of the fire protection
Page 8 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-792 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 522
district or the fire department shall pay the cost of providing the necessary training
to a local arson investigator in order to obtain P.O.S.T. firearm credentials.
(3) A local arson investigator who is required to obtain P.O.S.T. firearm
credentials may attend any school or training course that is operated by a commercial
entity or a public agency and is open to peace officers from more than one law
enforcement agency. Each person or agency operating a school or a training course
that is attended by a local arson investigator shall award the appropriate
documentation to each local arson investigator who successfully completes the
requirements for obtaining P.O.S.T. firearm credentials. The Louisiana Commission
on Law Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice and the Council on
Peace Officer Standards and Training shall take any necessary action to enable a
local arson investigator to attend the required schools and training courses and to
ensure a local arson investigator receives the appropriate documents to demonstrate
that he has successfully obtained P.O.S.T. firearm credentials upon completion of the
required schooling and training.
(4) Possession of P.O.S.T. firearm credentials does not grant a local arson
investigator any authority beyond the scope of the commission issued pursuant to
this Subsection.
(5) The authority granted by a commission that is issued pursuant to this
Subsection shall be limited to only the powers, functions, duties, and responsibilities
that are established for a local arson investigator in this Section.
(6) The authority of a local arson investigator to carry and use firearms
pursuant to this Subsection is limited to the carrying of weapons while acting in the
course and scope of his official duties. A local arson investigator who carries a
concealed weapon pursuant to this Paragraph shall not be subject to criminal
prosecution for a violation of R.S. 14:95.
(7) For purposes of this Subsection, "P.O.S.T. firearm credentials" means a
certification, qualification, or both, in the use of firearms by the Council on Peace
Officer Standards and Training.
Page 9 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-792 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 522
Section 3. R.S. 40:1563.1 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 4. This Section and Section 1 of this Act shall become effective upon
signature by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for
bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section
18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved
by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.
Section 5. This Section and Sections 2 and 3 shall become effective on June 30,
2028.